Utah statutes.
34-29-11.   Register of employers to be kept.

Each employment agent licensed under this chapter shall enter upon a register, to be kept for that purpose and to be known as an "employers' register," every order received from any corporation, company or individual desiring the service of any persons seeking work or employment, the name and address of the corporation, company or individual from whom such order was received, the number of persons wanted, the nature of the work or employment, the town or city (street and number, if any) where such work or employment is to be furnished and the wages to be paid.

